sk-SK: Typ pripojenia ohrievača vody: Svorka; Príruba so štyrmi skrutkami; Rýchlospojka; Skrutka; Zasúvanie; Iné
fi: Vedenlämmitinelementin yhteystyyppi: Kiinnitys; Neljän pultin laippa; Pikaliitin; Ruuvikiinnitys; Työnnettävä; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de conectare a elementului de încălzire a apei: Cu prindere prin clemă; Flanșă cu patru șuruburi; Conectare rapidă; Cu înșurubare; Prin alunecare; Altele
nb: Koblingstype for varmtvannsberederelement: Klemme-på; Fireboltsflens; Hurtigkobling; Skru inn; Sett inn; Annet
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης αντίστασης θερμοσίφωνα: Σφιγκτήρας; Φλάντζα τεσσάρων μπουλονιών; Ταχυσύνδεση; Βιδωτό; Ολίσθησης; Άλλο
ko: 온수기 히터 요소 연결 유형: 클램프인; 4볼트 플랜지; 급속 연결식; 나사 고정식; 슬립인; 기타
pl: Rodzaj połączenia elementu podgrzewacza wody: Mocowanie zaciskowe; Kołnierz czterośrubowy; Szybkozłączka; Wkręcane; Wsuwane; Inne
sv: Typ av anslutning för värmeelement till varmvattenberedare: fastklämd; Fyrbultsfläns; Snabbanslutning; Skruva in; Trä på; Annat
tr: Su ısıtıcı elemanı bağlantı tipi: Kelepçeli; Dört cıvatalı flanş; Hızlı bağlantı; Vidalı; Geçmeli; Diğer
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อของตัวทำความร้อนเครื่องทำน้ำอุ่น: แบบหนีบยึดติด; หน้าแปลน 4 รูน็อต; สวมเร็ว; ขันสกรู; แบบสอดเข้า; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 热水器元件连接类型: 卡入式; 四螺栓法兰; 快接式; 螺丝固定; 插入式; 其他
vi: Loại kết nối bộ phận sưởi nước: Kẹp; Mặt bích bốn bu lông; Kết nối nhanh; Vặn vít; Kiểu cắm vào; Khác
en: Water heater element connection type: Clamp-in; Four-bolt flange; Quick connect; Screw-in; Slip-in; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão do elemento do aquecedor de água: Fixação por grampo; Flange de quatro parafusos; Conexão rápida; Rosqueável; Slip-in; Outro
ru: Тип подключения нагревательного элемента: Зажимное; Четырехболтовый фланец; Быстросъемное; Резьбовое; Вставное; Другое
fr: Type de raccordement de l’élément pour chauffe-eau: À pince; Bride à quatre boulons; Connexion rapide; À visser; Enfichable; Autre
lt-LT: Vandens šildytuvo kaitinimo elemento jungties tipas: Tvirtinamas spaustuku; Keturių varžtų flanšas; Greito sujungimo; Įsukamas; Įstatomas; Kita
hu: Vízmelegítő elem kapcsolati típusa: Bilincs; Négycsavaros perem; Gyorscsatlakozó; Csavaros; Rácsúsztatható; Egyéb
da: Vandvarmerelements tilslutningstype: Clamp-in; Fireboltsflange; Hurtigkobling; Screw-in; Slip-in; Andet
it: Tipo di collegamento dell'elemento riscaldante dell'acqua: A morsetto; Flangia a quattro bulloni; Attacco rapido; Avvitabile; A innesto; Altro
ja: 給湯エレメントの接続タイプ: クランプイン; 4ボルトフランジ; クイックコネクト; ねじ込み式; スリップイン; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação do elemento de aquecimento e água: Fixação por braçadeira; Flange de quatro parafusos; Ligação rápida; Aparafusável; Encaixe; Outro
nl: Aansluitingstype boilerelement: Klemverbinding; Flens met vier bouten; Snelkoppeling; Inschroefbaar; Insteekelement; Overig
de: Anschlusstyp des Heizelements: Einklemmen; Vierbolzenflansch; Schnellanschluss; Einschrauben; Einschieben; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 熱水器加熱元件連接類型: 夾緊; 四螺栓法蘭; 快速連接; 螺絲固定; 滑入式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka grelnega elementa vode: Vpetje; Prirobnica s štirimi vijaki; Hitra povezava; Privijanje; Vstavljiv; Druga
cs: Typ uchycení topného tělesa ohřívače vody: Upínací; Příruba na 4 šrouby; Rychlospojka; Šroubovací; Zasouvací; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип свързване на нагревателния елемент на бойлера: Затягане; Фланец с четири болта; Бързо свързване; С резба за завиване; Вграждане; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka za element grijača vode: Stezanje; Prirubnica s četiri vijka; Brzi priključak; Uvrtanje; Uvlačenje; Ostalo
es: Tipo de conexión del elemento del calentador de agua: Abrazadera; Brida de cuatro pernos; Conexión rápida; Montaje atornillado; Inserción; Otros